Mississippi, session 2026, HB301.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the fire departments in Supervisors District 4 of Winston County, Mississippi, listed in Section 2 of this act to assist in paying costs associated with purchasing new equipment for fire trucks, improving training facilities, adding additional thermal imaging cameras and/or replacing out-of-date equipment for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................... $200,000.00 SECTION 2.  The money appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be distributed in equal amounts of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) to each of the following fire departments in Winston County: Betheden Volunteer Fire Department, East Winston Volunteer Fire Department, High Point Volunteer Fire Department, and Louisville Fire Department. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.